Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1474
Political newsletter or mass mailing; not to be sent at public expense; violation; penalty.

No political newsletter or other campaign mass mailing shall be sent at public expense by or on behalf of any elected official after that person has announced his or her candidacy for any office. An elected official violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 74;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 47;

Laws 1986, LB 548, § 13.